District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

32-1671

Use of local funds designated for adult training.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 2261, 57 DCR 181
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9015, 61 DCR 9990

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2261 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9015 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9015 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9015 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Short Title

Short title: Section 2260 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle BB of title II of the act may be cited as the “Adult Training Funding Act of 2009”.

Editor's Notes

Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the repeal by § 9015 of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.